Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-3426
Execution of power of attorney; effect on right to routine care.

By executing a power of attorney for health care, a principal shall not waive his or her right to routine hygiene, nursing, and comfort care and the usual and typical provision of nutrition and hydration.

Laws 1992, LB 696, § 25.